North Carolina, session 2025, SB1010.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Title. – This act shall be known as the "Framework for Upgrading
Technology, Utilities, Resiliency, and Economies (FUTURE) NC Infrastructure Act."
SECTION 2. Legislative Findings and Purpose. – The General Assembly finds that
North Carolina's infrastructure systems are essential to public health, safety, economic growth,
and quality of life. The State faces increasing demands from population growth, aging
infrastructure, and exposure to severe weather events. Existing funding systems, while effective
within their domains, operate independently and do not provide a unified, long-term statewide
strategy. The purpose of this act is to establish a commission to develop a comprehensive,
forward-looking, and flexible infrastructure investment framework that emphasizes preservation,
resiliency, and strategic growth over a 20-year horizon.
SECTION 3. Establishment of the Commission. – The North Carolina Infrastructure
Investment Commission (Commission) is established. All of the following shall apply:
(1) The Commission shall consist of 10 members appointed as follows:
a. Two members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
b. Two members appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives.
c. Two members appointed by the Governor.
d. Four members appointed by the State Treasurer.
(2) Initial members shall be appointed no later than 60 days after the effective
date of this act. Vacancies shall be filled by the original appointing authority
for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(3) The State Treasurer shall serve as the chair of the Commission and shall
convene the first meeting of the Commission no later than 30 days after a
quorum has been appointed. The Commission shall have a quorum when six
members are present, and acts of the Commission shall require a vote; a
majority of members must be present and voting.
(4) The Commission shall be administratively housed within the Department of
State Treasurer.
*S1010-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) Members may receive per diem and travel reimbursement as provided in
G.S. 93B-5. The Commission shall be subject to Article 33C of Chapter 143
and Chapter 132 of the North Carolina General Statutes.
SECTION 4. Duties of the Commission. – The Commission shall develop and
submit a comprehensive statewide infrastructure investment plan. The Commission shall not be
bound to any specific formula or weighting but shall evaluate and recommend an approach that
best achieves statewide objectives. The plan shall reflect a long-term vision and may include the
following:
(1) A 20-year strategic framework for infrastructure investment, including
identification of major needs across transportation, water, wastewater,
stormwater, resiliency, and other critical systems.
(2) A general policy approach that emphasizes maintenance, repair,
consolidation, regionalization, and modernization of existing assets while also
addressing strategic expansion needs.
(3) Potential allocation approaches that distinguish between preservation, growth,
and resiliency investments, without requiring fixed percentages.
(4) Development of a prioritization framework that may include consideration of
any of the following:
a. Infrastructure condition and risk of failure.
b. Public health and safety impacts.
c. Economic and workforce impacts.
d. System resiliency and vulnerability.
e. Project readiness and local participation.
f. Regional equity and geographic distribution.
(5) Identification of opportunities to coordinate and align with existing State
programs, including transportation, water infrastructure, and capital funding
systems, without disrupting existing statutory frameworks.
(6) Exploration of funding strategies, including the following:
a. State appropriations.
b. Federal funding opportunities and grant programs.
c. Loan and revolving fund structures.
d. Public-private partnerships where appropriate.
e. Braiding and blending of funding sources to maximize impact and
efficiency.
f. Debt issuance.
(7) Recommendations for governance, accountability, transparency, and
performance measurement.
(8) Consideration of best practices from other states and national models.
SECTION 5. Submission of Plan. – The Commission shall submit an interim plan
to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, Speaker of the House of Representatives, Joint
Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, Joint Legislative Transportation
Oversight Committee, House Committee on Appropriations, Capital and Information
Technology, House Appropriations Committee on Transportation, Senate Committee on
Appropriations/Base Budget, Senate Committee on Department of Transportation, and Governor
within 12 months of its first meeting. The Commission shall submit a final plan to these entities
by March 31, 2028. No portion of the plan shall be implemented by any State agency unless
authorized to do so through an act of the General Assembly. Upon the submission of the plan,
the Commission shall expire and all records of the Commission shall be transferred to the
Department of State Treasurer for retention in accordance with applicable records retention
schedules.
Page 2 Senate Bill 1010-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 6. Staff and Support. – The Department of State Treasurer shall provide
administrative support to the Commission. State agencies shall cooperate with the Commission
upon request for information that supports the development of the plan.
SECTION 7. Appropriation. – Effective July 1, 2026, there is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Department of State Treasurer the sum of three hundred thousand dollars
($300,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year for administration of the
Commission.
SECTION 8. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Senate Bill 1010-First Edition Page 3